South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4704.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Effective July 1, 2026, the South Carolina 211 Network, created within the Budget and Control Board pursuant to Section 1-11-770 by Act 339 of 2002, is transferred to the Department of Consumer Affairs. SECTION 2.  Chapter 6, Part 5, Title 37 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 37-6-515.  (A) Pursuant to Section 1-11-770(C), there is created within the Department of Consumer Affairs a statewide South Carolina 211 Network, which must serve as the single point of coordination for information and referral for health and human services. The objectives for establishing the South Carolina 211 Network are to: (1) provide comprehensive and cost-effective access to health and human services information; (2) improve access to accurate information by simplifying and enhancing state and local health and human services information and referral systems and by fostering collaboration among information and referral systems; (3) electronically connect local information and referral systems to each other, to service providers, and to consumers of information and referral services; (4) establish and promote standards for data collection and for distributing information among state and local organizations; (5) promote the use of a common dialing access code and the visibility and public awareness of the availability of information and referral services; (6) provide a management and administrative structure to support the South Carolina 211 Network and establish technical assistance, training, and support programs for information and referral-service programs; (7) test methods for integrating information and referral services with local and state health and human services programs and for consolidating and streamlining eligibility and case-management processes; (8) provide access to standardized, comprehensive data to assist in identifying gaps and needs in health and human services programs; and (9) provide a unified systems plan with a developed platform, taxonomy, and standards for data management and access. (B)(1) In order to participate in the South Carolina 211 Network, a 211 provider must be certified by the Department of Consumer Affairs. The department must develop criteria for certification and must adopt the criteria as regulations. (2) If any provider of information and referral services or other entity leases a 211 number from a local exchange company and is not certified by the department, the department shall, after consultation with the local exchange company and the Public Service Commission, request that the Federal Communications Commission direct the local exchange company to revoke the use of the 211 number. (3) The department shall seek the assistance and guidance of the Public Service Commission and the Federal Communications Commission in resolving any disputes arising over jurisdiction related to 211 numbers. SECTION 3.  Section 1-11-770 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (C) The South Carolina 211 Network program authorized by this section is transferred to the Department of Consumer Affairs and is established thereto as set forth in Section 37-6-515. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect on July 1, 2026. ----XX----